Utah statutes.
41-1a-711.   Compliance of foreign motor vehicle required prior to sale -- Penalty.

(1)  A person may not knowingly sell or offer for sale in this state any vehicle referred to in Section 41-1a-225 without providing to the purchaser at the time of purchase evidence of:

(a)  legal entry of the vehicle into the United States from the United States Customs Service; and

(b)  compliance with the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the United States Department of Transportation requirements applicable to the vehicle.

(2)  It is a class A misdemeanor to violate this section.

